Hawaii statutes.
[§235-109.5] Credits against income;
claim limitation. (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary providing
for a tax credit that may be claimed against a taxpayer's tax liability under
section 235-110.51, 235-110.9, 241-4.8, or 431:7-209 for taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and ending before January 1, 2011, no
claim for these tax credits shall exceed eighty per cent of the taxpayer's tax
liability for the taxable year in which the credit is claimed, and any tax
credits claimed shall not result in any credit carryovers.

(b) This section shall apply to investments
made, renovation costs incurred, or eligible depreciable tangible property
placed in service on or after May 1, 2009. [L 2009, c 178, §1]

Note

Section applies to investments made, renovation costs
incurred, or eligible depreciable tangible property placed in service on or
after May 1, 2009. L 2009, c 178, §10.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next